Nebraska, session 109, LB685.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
Section 1. The school board or governing body of each approved or
accredited public, private, denominational, or parochial school shall
have one exterior secure master key box that meets Underwriters
Laboratories Standard 1037 installed at each school building to permit
emergency access from the exterior of a school building to law
enforcement. The school board or governing body shall work with local law
enforcement authorities in the school district on the precise location of
the secure master key box required pursuant to this section. The school
board or governing body shall adopt a policy consistent with this
section.
Sec. 2. Section 79-2,144, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2,144 The state school security director appointed pursuant to
section 79-2,143 shall be responsible for providing leadership and
support for safety and security for the public schools. Duties of the
director include, but are not limited to:
(1) Collecting safety and security plans, required pursuant to rules
and regulations of the State Department of Education relating to
accreditation of schools, and other school security information from each
school system in Nebraska. School districts shall provide the state
school security director with the safety and security plans of the school
district and any other security information requested by the director,
but any plans or information submitted by a school district may be
withheld by the department pursuant to subdivision (9) of section
84-712.05;
(2) Recommending minimum standards for school security on or before
January 1, 2016, to the State Board of Education;
(3) Conducting an assessment of the security of each public school
building, which assessment shall be completed by August 31, 2019;
(4) Overseeing compliance by public schools with installation of a
secure master key box pursuant to section 1 of this act;
-2-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
(5) (4) Identifying deficiencies in school security based on the
minimum standards adopted by the State Board of Education and making
recommendations to school boards for remedying such deficiencies;
(6) (5) Establishing security awareness and preparedness tools and
training programs for public school staff;
(7) (6) Establishing research-based model instructional programs for
staff, students, and parents to address the underlying causes for violent
attacks on schools;
(8) (7) Overseeing behavioral and mental health training, with a
focus on suicide awareness and prevention in public schools pursuant to
section 79-2,146;
(9) (8) Establishing tornado preparedness standards which shall
include, but not be limited to, ensuring that every school conducts at
least two tornado drills per year;
(10) (9) Responding to inquiries and requests for assistance
relating to school security from private, denominational, and parochial
schools;
(11) (10) Recommending curricular and extracurricular materials to
assist school districts in preventing and responding to cyberbullying and
digital citizenship issues; and
(12) (11) Carrying out the department's responsibilities under the
School Safety and Security Reporting System Act.
Sec. 3. Section 79-3108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3108 (1) The Commissioner of Education shall create and
administer a competitive grant program to provide funding to school
districts and to educational service units on behalf of approved or
accredited nonpublic schools for security-related infrastructure
projects. Such qualifying projects may include, but are not limited to,
an exterior secure master key box as required pursuant to section 1 of
this act, surveillance equipment, door-locking systems, and double-entry
-3-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
doors for school buildings. Subject to available appropriations, the
State Department of Education shall provide a grant to any school
district or educational service unit that applies for such grant for use
in funding qualifying projects.
(2)(a) A school district may apply to the State Department of
Education for a grant on forms and in a manner prescribed by the
Commissioner of Education. A school district receiving a grant under this
section shall divide the use of grant funds as evenly as possible among
all eligible school buildings within such district.
(b) An educational service unit may apply to the State Department of
Education for a grant on forms and in a manner prescribed by the
Commissioner of Education for use in funding qualifying projects at
approved or accredited nonpublic schools which contract with such
educational service unit on such qualifying projects. An approved or
accredited nonpublic school may apply to and contract with the
appropriate educational service unit in the school's area in a manner
prescribed by the educational service unit for purposes of funding
qualifying projects pursuant to this section.
(3)(a) On or before December 1 of each year that grants were issued
pursuant to this section, the State Department of Education shall provide
a report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature relating to such
grants, which shall include, but need not be limited to:
(i) The number of schools that received grant funding, including
whether a school was public or nonpublic, the grades of students served
by such school, the number of students that attend such school, and the
geographic location of such school;
(ii) How the grant funds were used;
(iii) The average amount of grant funds received by schools broken
down by school student population size;
(iv) The number of schools that were denied grant funding and why;
and
-4-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
(v) Any other information the State Department of Education deems
necessary.
(b) The report provided pursuant to subdivision (a) of this
subsection shall not identify any particular school.
(4) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
(5) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate ten million
dollars from the School Safety and Security Fund to the State Department
of Education to administer the grant program pursuant to this section.
Sec. 4. Section 79-3109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-3109 (1) The School Safety and Security Fund is created. The fund
shall be administered by the State Department of Education and shall
consist of any money transferred by the Legislature and any gifts,
grants, or bequests. The department shall use money in the fund for
grants for security-related infrastructure projects pursuant to section
79-3108. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning
October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from investment of money in the
fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
(2) The department shall establish a subaccount for the one million
dollars transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund on or after the effective
date of this act. The money in the subaccount shall be used to provide
grants pursuant to section 79-3108 for the exterior secure master key box
required pursuant to section 1 of this act.
Sec. 5. Section 84-612, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-612 (1) There is hereby created within the state treasury a fund
known as the Cash Reserve Fund which shall be under the direction of the
State Treasurer. The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.
-5-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
(2) The State Treasurer shall transfer funds from the Cash Reserve
Fund to the General Fund upon certification by the Director of
Administrative Services that the current cash balance in the General Fund
is inadequate to meet current obligations. Such certification shall
include the dollar amount to be transferred. Any transfers made pursuant
to this subsection shall be reversed upon notification by the Director of
Administrative Services that sufficient funds are available.
(3) In addition to receiving transfers from other funds, the Cash
Reserve Fund shall receive federal funds received by the State of
Nebraska for undesignated general government purposes, federal revenue
sharing, or general fiscal relief of the state.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer fifteen million eight hundred
forty-one thousand dollars from the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund to the
Cash Reserve Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(5) The State Treasurer shall transfer one hundred sixty-six million
six hundred seventy-three thousand five hundred eighty dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after
July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(6) No funds shall be transferred from the Cash Reserve Fund to
fulfill the obligations created under the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive
Act unless the balance in the Cash Reserve Fund after such transfer will
be at least equal to five hundred million dollars.
(7) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the School Safety and Security Fund as soon as
administratively possible after September 2, 2023, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
-6-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
(8) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Risk Loss Trust on or before June 30, 2024,
on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(9) The State Treasurer shall transfer eleven million three hundred
twenty thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and
Human Services Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but on or before June
30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(10) The State Treasurer shall transfer five hundred seventy-four
million five hundred thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the
Perkins County Canal Project Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(11) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million one hundred
fifteen thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Public Safety
Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(12) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska Public Safety Communication System
Revolving Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(13) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million four hundred
twenty-five thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Nebraska
Public Safety Communication System Revolving Fund on or after July 1,
2024, but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
-7-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
(14) The State Treasurer shall transfer seventy million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Shovel-Ready Capital Recovery and Investment
Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates
and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(15) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Site and Building Development Fund on or after
July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(16) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Economic Development Cash Fund on or after
July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts
as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(17) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred forty million
dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Economic Recovery Contingency
Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates
and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(18) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Critical Infrastructure Facilities Cash Fund on
or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in
such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget
division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(19) The State Treasurer shall transfer four hundred forty million
dollars from the General Fund to the Cash Reserve Fund on or after July
1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(20) The State Treasurer shall transfer four million dollars from
-8-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but
before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by
the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(21) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-nine million four
hundred fifty-eight thousand eight hundred dollars from the Cash Reserve
Fund to the Nebraska Capital Construction Fund on or after July 1, 2024,
but before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed
by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(22) The State Treasurer shall transfer two million five hundred
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Materiel Division
Revolving Fund on or after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(23) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Youth Outdoor Education Innovation Fund on or
after July 1, 2023, but before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(24) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-eight million dollars
from the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund to the Cash
Reserve Fund on or before June 30, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(25) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the State Insurance Fund on or before July 10,
2024, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(26) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million five hundred
-9-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Health and Human
Services Cash Fund on or after July 1, 2024, but on or before June 30,
2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(27) The State Treasurer shall transfer three million two hundred
fifty thousand dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the State Insurance
Fund as soon as possible after April 2, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(28) The State Treasurer shall transfer five million dollars from
the Cash Reserve Fund to the Municipality Infrastructure Aid Fund on or
after July 1, 2024, but before July 15, 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services.
(29) The State Treasurer shall transfer twenty-five million dollars
from the Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or
before June 30, 2025, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by
the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(30) The State Treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund on or after July
1, 2025, but before June 30, 2026, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the
Department of Administrative Services.
(31) The State Treasurer shall transfer one million dollars from the
Cash Reserve Fund to the School Safety and Security Fund as soon as
administratively possible after the effective date of this act, on such
dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the
budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(32) (31) It is the intent of the Legislature to transfer two
-10-

LB685 LB685
2025 2025
hundred million dollars from the Cash Reserve Fund to the General Fund on
or after July 1, 2026, but before June 30, 2027, if the balance of the
Cash Reserve Fund on July 1, 2026, after accounting for the transfers in
this section, does not fall below sixteen percent of the amount
appropriated, excluding encumbered and certified reappropriations, from
the General Fund for fiscal year 2026-27.
Sec. 6. Original sections 79-2,144, 79-3108, 79-3109, and 84-612,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-11-